Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2912
Dual capacity.

A person may be both a patron member and an investor member. A person that is both a patron member and an investor member has the rights, powers, duties, and obligations provided by the Nebraska Limited Cooperative Association Act and the articles of organization or bylaws in each of those capacities. When the person acts as a patron member, the person is subject to the obligations, duties, and restrictions under the act and the articles of organization or bylaws governing patron members. When the person acts as an investor member, the person is subject to the obligations, duties, and restrictions under the act and the articles of organization or bylaws governing investor members.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 12.